District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.38

Veteran-owned business enterprises.

A business enterprise shall be eligible for certification as a veteran-owned business enterprise if the business enterprise:

(1)

Is a local business enterprise;

(2)

Is not less than 51% owned and operated by one of more veterans (as defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101(2));

(3)

In the case of any publicly owned business, not less than 51% of the stock of which is owned by one or more veterans; and

(4)

One or more veterans control the management and daily operations.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2338
as added Apr. 20, 2010, D.C. Law 18-141, § 2(g), 57 DCR 1485
June 10, 2014, D.C. Law 20-108, § 2(o), 61 DCR 3892
This section is referenced in § 2-218.02.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-108 rewrote (1).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-108: Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that applications pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be subject to the provisions of the act.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that, except as provided in § 2-218.46(f), contracts existing or pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be affected by the provisions of the act.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7005.